Utah statutes.
68-4-8.   Duties of commissioners.

(1)  The commissioners shall:

(a)  participate in the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws on behalf of the state;

(b)  examine the subjects upon which uniformity of legislation in the various states of the union is desirable but that are outside the jurisdiction of the Congress of the United States;

(c)  confer upon these matters with the commissioners appointed by other states for the same purpose;

(d)  at the direction of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, serve on national committees that draft uniform and model laws; and

(e)  devise and recommend other means to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(2)  The commission may request a legislator to sponsor, as an item on the interim study resolution, or as a bill or resolution for introduction, any uniform legislation that the commission determines would be in the best interests of the state to adopt.

